zh-TW: 活動: 有氧運動; 合氣道; 空氣曲棍球; 澳式橄欖球; 羽球; 芭蕾舞; 棒球; 籃球; 拳擊; 巴西柔術; 賽車; 啦啦隊; 攀爬運動; 板球; 單車; 舞蹈; 飛鏢用鏢; 草地曲棍球; 釣魚; 地板曲棍球; 足球; 五人制足球; 蓋爾式足球; 高爾夫球; 體操; 手球; 健行; 曲棍球; 馬術; 狩獵; 愛爾蘭式曲棍球; 冰上曲棍球; 直排輪; 柔道; 空手道; 踢拳; 以色列格鬥術; 長曲棍球; 綜合格鬥 (MMA); 騎摩托車; 泰拳; 籃網球運動; 板網球; 普拉提斯; 壁球; 繞圈球; 橄欖球; 跑步; 滑板用品; 滑雪; 單板滑雪; 足球; 壘球; 壁球; 跆拳道; 手球比賽; 網球; 田徑運動; 極限飛盤; 通用; 排球; 水球; 摔角; 瑜珈; 其他
th: กิจกรรม: แอโรบิก; ไอคิโด; แอร์ฮอกกี้; ออสเตรเลียนฟุตบอล; แบดมินตัน; บัลเลต์; เบสบอล; บาสเก็ตบอล; มวย; บราซิลเลียนยิวยิตสู; การแข่งขันรถยนต์; เชียร์ลีดดิ้ง; ปีนเขา; คริกเก็ต; ปั่นจักรยาน; เต้น; ลูกดอก; ฮอกกี้บนพื้นหญ้า; การตกปลา; ฟลอร์บอล; อเมริกันฟุตบอล; ฟุตซอล; เกลิกฟุตบอล; กอล์ฟ; ยิมนาสติก; แฮนด์บอล; การเดินป่า; ฮอกกี้; ขี่ม้า; มีดพราน; เฮอร์ลิง; ฮอกกี้น้ำแข็ง; อินไลน์สเกต; ยูโด; คาราเต้; มวยเตะ; คราฟมากา; ลาครอส; ศิลปะการต่อสู้แบบผสมผสาน (MMA); ขี่จักรยานยนต์; มวยไทย; เน็ตบอล; ปาเดล; พิลาทิส; แร็กเก็ตบอล; ราวน์เดอร์; รักบี้; การวิ่ง; การเล่นสเกตบอร์ด; เล่นสกี; เล่นสโนว์บอร์ด; ฟุตบอล; ซอฟท์บอล; สควอช; เทควันโด; แฮนด์บอลแบบทีม; เทนนิส; กรีฑาลู่และลาน; จานร่อน; อเนกประสงค์; วอลเลย์บอล; โปโลน้ำ; มวยปล้ำ; โยคะ; อื่นๆ
ja: アクティビティ: エアロビクス; 合気道; エアホッケー; オーストラリアンフットボール; バドミントン; バレエ; 野球; バスケットボール; ボクシング; ブラジリアン柔術; 自動車競技; チアリーディング; クライミング; クリケット; サイクリング; ダンス; ダーツ; フィールドホッケー; 釣り; フロアボール; フットボール; フットサル; ゲーリックフットボール; ゴルフ; 体操; ハンドボール; ハイキング; ホッケー; 乗馬; 狩猟; ハーリング; アイスホッケー; インラインスケート; 柔道; 空手; キックボクシング; クラヴマガ; ラクロス; 総合格闘技 (MMA); オートバイ; ムエタイ; ネットボール; パデル; ピラティス; ラケットボール; ラウンダーズ; ラグビー; ランニング; スケートボード; スキー; スノーボード; サッカー; ソフトボール; スカッシュ; テコンドー; チームハンドボール; テニス; 陸上競技; アルティメットフリスビー; ユニバーサル; バレーボール; 水球; レスリング; ヨガ; その他
da: Aktivitet: Aerobic; Aikido; Airhockey; Australsk fodbold; Badminton; Ballet; Baseball; Basketball; Boksning; Brasiliansk jiu-jitsu; Bilræs; Cheerleading; Klatring; Cricket; Cykling; Dans; Dartpile; Udendørs hockey; Fiskeri; Floorball; Fodbold; Futsal; Gælisk fodbold; Golf; Gymnastik; Håndbold; Vandring; Hockey; Ridning; Jagt; Hurling; Ishockey; Inline-skating; Judo; Karate; Kickboksning; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Mixed martial arts (MMA); Motorcykling; Muay thai; Netbold; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Rundbold; Rugby; Løb; Skateboarding; Ski; Snowboarding; Fodbold; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Håndbold; Tennis; Baneatletik; Ultimate frisbee; Universal; Volleyball; Vandpolo; Brydning; Yoga; Andet
pl: Czynność: Aerobik; Aikido; Hokej powietrzny; Futbol australijski; Badminton; Balet; Baseball; Koszykówka; Boks; Brazylijskie jiu-jitsu; Wyścigi samochodowe; Cheerleading; Wspinaczka; Krykiet; Kolarstwo; Taniec; Rzutki; Hokej na trawie; Rybołówstwo; Unihokej; Piłka nożna; Futsal; Futbol gaelicki; Golf; Gimnastyka; Piłka ręczna; Wędrówki górskie; Hokej; Jeździectwo; Łowiectwo; Kręgle; Hokej na lodzie; Rolkarstwo; Judo; Karate; Kickboxing; Krav-maga; Lacrosse; Mieszane sztuki walki (MMA); Jazda na motocyklu; Muay Thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Raquetball; Palant; Rugby; Praca; Jazda na deskorolce; Narciarstwo; Snowboarding; Piłka nożna; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Zespołowa piłka ręczna; Tenis; Lekkoatletyka; Frisbee wyczynowe; Uniwersalny; Siatkówka; Piłka wodna; Zapasy; Joga; Pozostałe
hu: Tevékenység: Aerobik; Aikido; Léghoki; Ausztrál futball; Tollaslabda; Balett; Baseball; Kosárlabda; Boksz; Brazil jiu-jitsu; Autóversenyzés; Szurkolás; Mászás; Krikett; Kerékpározás; Tánc; Darts; Gyeplabda; Horgászat; Floorball; Futball; Futsal; Kelta futball; Golf; Gimnasztika; Kézilabda; Túrázás; Hoki; Lovaglás; Vadászat; Hurling; Jéghoki; Görkorcsolya; Cselgáncs; Karate; Kickbox; Krav-Maga; Lacrosse; Vegyes harcművészetek (MMA); Motorozás; Muay-Thai; Netball; Evezés; Pilates; Raketball; Rounders; Rögbi; Futás; Gördeszkázás; Síelés; Snowboardozás; Futball; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Csapatkézilabda; Tenisz; Atlétika; Ultimate frizbi; Univerzális; Röplabda; Vízilabda; Birkózás; Jóga; Egyéb
fr: Activité physique: Aérobie; Aikido; Air Hockey; Football australien; Badminton; Ballet; Base-ball; Basket-ball; Boxe; Jiu Jitsu brésilien; Course de voitures; Cheerleading; Escalade; Criquet; Vélo; Danse; Fléchettes; Hockey sur gazon; Pêche; Balle au sol; Football américain; Futsal; football gaélique; Golf; Gymnastique; Handball; Randonnée; Hockey; Équitation; Chasse; Hurling; Hockey sur glace; Patinage en ligne; Judo; Karaté; Kickboxing; Krav-maga; Lacrosse; Arts martiaux mixtes (MMA); Faire de la moto; Muay Thaï; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Rounders; Rugby; Course; Skateboarding; Ski; Planche à neige; Football; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Handball en équipe; Tennis; Piste de course; Frisbee ultime; Universel; Volleyball; Water polo; Lutte; Yoga; Autre
vi: Hoạt động: Thể dục nhịp điệu; Võ thuật Aikido; Khúc côn cầu trên không; Bóng bầu dục Úc; Cầu lông; Ba lê; Bóng chày; Bóng rổ; Quyền anh; Nhu thuật Brazil; Đua xe; Thể dục cổ vũ; Leo núi; Bóng gậy; Đạp xe; Khiêu vũ; Phi tiêu; Lĩnh vực khúc côn cầu; Câu cá; Bóng sàn; Bóng đá; Bóng đá trong nhà; Bóng đá Gaelic; Gôn; Thể dục dụng cụ; Bóng ném; Đi bộ đường dài; Khúc côn cầu; Cưỡi ngựa; Dao đi săn; Vượt rào; Khúc côn cầu trên băng; Giày trượt băng; Võ judo; Võ karate; Quyền thuật; Võ krav maga; Bóng vợt; Võ tổng hợp (MMA); Lái xe mô tô; Muay Thái; Bóng lưới; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Cờ bạc; Bóng bầu dục; Chạy; Trượt ván; Trượt tuyết; Trượt ván trên tuyết; Bóng đá; Bóng mềm; Bóng quần; Taekwondo; Đội bóng ném; Quần vợt; Các môn điền kinh; Ném đĩa; Phổ biến; Bóng chuyền; Bóng nước; Đấu vật; Yoga; Khác
pt-BR: Atividade: Aeróbica; Aikidô; Hóquei de ar; Futebol australiano; Badminton; Balé; Beisebol; Basquete; Boxe; Jiu Jitsu brasileiro; Corrida de carro; Líder de torcida; Alpinismo; Críquete; Ciclismo; Dança; Dardos; Hóquei em campo; Pesca; Floorball; Futebol americano; Futsal; Futebol gaélico; Golf; Ginástica; Handebol; Caminhada; Hóquei; Hipismo; Caça; Hurling; Hóquei no gelo; Patins inline; Judô; Karatê; Kickboxing; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Artes marciais mistas (MMA); Motociclismo; Muay thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Raquetebol; Rounders; Rúgbi; Para corrida; Skate; Esqui; Snowboard; Futebol; Softbol; Squash; Taekwondo; Handebol de equipe; Tênis; Atletismo; Ultimate frisbee; Universal; Voleibol; Polo aquático; Luta grego-romana; Ioga; Outro
sv: Aktivitet: Aerobics; Aikido; Lufthockey; Australisk fotboll; Badminton; Balett; Baseboll; Basketboll; Boxning; Brasiliansk jiu-jitsu; Bilracing; Cheerleading; Klättring; Cricket; Cykling; Dans; Dart; Landhockey; Fiske; Innebandy; Fotboll; Futsal; Gaelisk fotboll; Golf; Gymnastik; Handboll; Vandring; Hockey; Ridning; Jakt; Hurling; Ishockey; Inlinesåkning; Judo; Karate; Kickboxning; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Mixed martial arts (MMA); Motorcykelåkning; Muay thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Rounders; Rugby; Löpning; Skateboardåkning; Skidåkning; Snowboardåkning; Fotboll; Softboll; Squash; Taekwondo; Handboll; Tennis; Friidrott; Ultimate frisbee; Universell; Volleyboll; Vattenpolo; Brottning; Yoga; Annat
pt-PT: Atividade: Aeróbica; Aikido; Hóquei de ar; Futebol australiano; Badminton; Balé; Basebol; Basquetebol; Boxe; Jiu-jitsu brasileiro; Corrida de automóveis; Claques; Escalada; Críquete; Ciclismo; Dança; Dardos; Hóquei em campo; Pesca; Floorball; Futebol americano; Futsal; Futebol gaélico; Golfe; Ginástica; Andebol; Caminhada; Hóquei; Equitação; Caça; Hurling; Hóquei no gelo; Patins em linha; Judo; Karaté; Kickboxing; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Artes marciais várias; Motociclismo; Muay Thai; Netbol; Padel; Pilates; Raquetebol; Rounders; Râguebi; Corrida; Skate; Esqui; Snowboard; Futebol; Softbol; Squash; Taekwondo; Andebol de equipa; Ténis; Atletismo; Ultimate frisbee; Universal; Voleibol; Polo-aquático; Luta livre; Ioga; Outro
lt-LT: Veikla: Aerobika; Aikido; Oro ritulys; Australiškasis futbolas; Badmintonas; Baletas; Beisbolas; Krepšinis; Boksas; Braziliškas džiudžitsu; Automobilių lenktynės; Komandų palaikymo šokiai; Laipiojimo sportas; Kriketas; Dviračių sportas; Šokiai; Smiginis; Žolės riedulys; Žvejyba; Grindų riedulys; Futbolas; Salės futbolas; Gėlų futbolas; Golfas; Gimnastika; Rankinis; Žygiai; Ritulys; Jodinėjimas žirgais; Medžioklė; Airiškasis futbolas; Ledo ritulys; Riedučių sportas; Dziudo; Karatė; Kikboksas; Krav maga; Lakrosas; Mišrūs kovos menai (MMA); Motociklų sportas; Muay thai; Netbolas; Padelis; Pilatesas; Raketbolas; Rounders; Regbis; Bėgimas; Riedlenčių sportas; Slidinėjimas; Snieglenčių sportas; Futbolas; Softbolas; Skvošas; Taekwondo; Komandinis rankinis; Tenisas; Lengvoji atletika; Lėkščiasvydis; Universalus; Tinklinis; Vandensvydis; Imtynės; Joga; Kita
de: Aktivität: Aerobic; Aikido; Airhockey; Australian football; Badminton; Ballett; Baseball; Basketball; Boxen; Brasilianisches Jiu-Jitsu; Autorennen; Cheerleading; Klettern; Kricket; Radfahren; Tanzen; Darts; Feldhockey; Angeln; Unihockey; Fußball; Futsal; Gälischer Fußball; Golf; Gymnastik; Handball; Wandern; Hockey; Pferdereiten; Jagd; Hurling; Eishockey; Inlineskating; Judo; Karate; Kickboxen; Krav Maga; Lacrosse; Mixed Martial Arts (MMA); Motorradfahren; Muay-Thai; Netzball; Padel-Tennis; Pilates; Racquetball; Rounders; Rugby; Laufen; Skateboarden; Skifahren; Snowboarden; Fußball; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Mannschaftshandball; Tennis; Leichtathletik; Ultimative Frisbee; Universell; Volleyball; Wasserball; Ringen; Yoga; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Активност: Аеробика; Айкидо; Въздушен хокей; Австралийски футбол; Бадминтон; Балет; Бейзбол; Баскетбол; Бокс; Бразилско джу-джицу; Състезания с коли; Мажоретки; Катерене; Крикет; Колоездене; Танци; Дартс; Хокей на трева; Риболов; Флорбол; Американски футбол; Футзал; Галски футбол; Голф; Гимнастика; Хандбал; Туризъм; Хокей; Конна езда; Лов; Хърлинг; Хокей на лед; Каране на ролери; Джудо; Карате; Кикбокс; Крав мага; Лакрос; Смесени бойни изкуства (MMA); Мотоциклетизъм; Муай тай; Нетбол; Падъл; Пилатес; Ракетбол; Раундърс; Ръгби; Бягане; Скейтборд; Ски; Сноуборд; Футбол; Софтбол; Скуош; Таекуондо; Отборен хандбал; Тенис; Лека атлетика; Ултимейт фризби; Универсален; Волейбол; Водна топка; Борба; Йога; Други
zh-CN: 活动: 有氧运动; 合气道; 空气曲棍球; 澳式足球; 羽毛球; 芭蕾舞; 棒球; 篮球用品; 拳击; 巴西柔术; 赛车比赛; 啦啦队用品; 攀岩用品; 板球用品; 自行车用品; 舞蹈; 镖; 场地曲棍球; 钓鱼; 地板球; 橄榄球; 室内五人制足球; 盖尔足球; 高尔夫用品; 体操; 手球; 徒步; 曲棍球; 骑马; 狩猎用品; 爱尔兰式曲棍球; 冰球; 内行滑冰; 柔道; 空手道; 跆拳道; 以色列马珈术; 长曲棍球; 综合格斗 (MMA); 摩托运动; 泰拳; 无挡板篮球; 笼式网球; 普拉提; 壁球; 圆场球用具; 英式橄榄球用品; 跑步; 滑板; 滑雪运动; 单板滑雪; 足球用品; 垒球; 壁球; 跆拳道; 团体手球; 网球用品; 田径; 终极飞盘; 通用; 排球用品; 水球; 摔跤用品; 瑜伽; 其他
es: Actividad: Aeróbicos; Aikido; Hockey de aire; Fútbol australiano; Bádminton; Ballet; Béisbol; Baloncesto; Boxeo; Jiu-jitsu brasileño; Carrera de coches; Animadoras; Escalada; Cricket; Ciclismo; Baile; Dardos; Hockey sobre hierba; Pesca; Floorball; Fútbol; Fútbol sala; Fútbol gaélico; Golf; Gimnasia; Balonmano; Senderismo; Hóckey; Equitación; Caza; Hurling; Hockey sobre hielo; Patinaje en línea; Judo; Kárate; Kickboxing; Krav Magá; Lacrosse; Artes marciales mixtas (MMA); Motociclismo; Muay thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Ráquetbol; Rounders; Rugby; Correr; Skateboarding; Esquí; Snowboard; Fútbol; Sóftbol; Squash; Taekwondo; Balonmano; Tenis; Atletismo; Ultimate frisbee; Universal; Vóleibol; Polo acuático; Lucha libre; Yoga; Otros
nl: Activiteit: Aerobics; Aikido; Airhockey; Australisch voetbal; Badminton; Ballet; Baseball; Basketbal; Boksen; Braziliaans jiu jitsu; Autoracen; Cheerleading; Klimmen; Cricket; Fietsen; Dansen; Darten; Veldhockey; Vissen; Floorball; Voetbal; Futsal; Gaelisch voetbal; Golf; Gymnastiek; Handbal; Hiking; Hockey; Paardrijden; Jagen; Hurling; IJshockey; Inline skaten; Judo; Karate; Kickboxen; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Gemengde vechtsporten (MMA); Motorrijden; Muay Thai; Netbal; Padel; Pilates; Racketbal; Rounders; Rugby; Rennen; Skateboarden; Skiën; Snowboarden; Voetbal; Softbal; Squash; Taekwondo; Teamhandbal; Tennis; Atletiek; Ultieme frisbee; Universeel; Volleybal; Waterpolo; Worstelen; Yoga; Andere
sk-SK: Aktivita: Aerobik; Aikido; Vzdušný hokej; Austrálsky futbal; Bedminton; Balet; Bejzbal; Basketbal; Box; Brazílske jiu-jitsu; Automobilové preteky; Roztlieskavanie; Lezenie; Kriket; Bicyklovanie; Tancovanie; Šípky; Pozemný hokej; Rybolov; Florbal; Futbal; Futsal; Írske ragby; Golf; Gymnastika; Hádzaná; Pešia turistika; Hokej; Jazda na koni; Poľovníctvo; Hurling; Ľadový hokej; Inline korčuľovanie; Džudo; Karate; Kickbox; Krav maga; Lakros; Zmiešané bojové umenia (MMA); Motorkárstvo; Muay thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Raketbal; Rounders; Ragby; Beh; Skateboarding; Lyžovanie; Snowboarding; Futbal; Softbal; Squash; Taekwondo; Tímová hádzaná; Tenis; Atletická dráha; Ultimate frisbee; Univerzálny; Volejbal; Vodné pólo; Zápasenie; Joga; Iné
ru: Вид активности: Аэробика; Айкидо; Аэрохоккей; Австралийский футбол; Бадминтон; Балет; Бейсбол; Баскетбол; Бокс; Бразильское джиу-джитсу; Автомобильные гонки; Чирлидинг; Скалолазание; Крикет; Велоспорт; Танцы; Дартс; Хоккей на траве; Рыбалка; Флорбол; Футбол; Футзал; Гэльский футбол; Гольф; Гимнастика; Гандбол; Пеший туризм; Хоккей; Верховая езда; Охота; Херлинг; Хоккей на льду; Роллерблейдинг; Дзюдо; Каратэ; Кикбоксинг; Крав-мага; Лакросс; Смешанные боевые искусства (ММА); Мотоспорт; Муай-тай; Нетбол; Падель; Пилатес; Ракетбол; Английская лапта; Регби; Бег; Скейтбординг; Лыжный спорт; Сноубординг; Соккер; Софтбол; Сквош; Тхэквондо; Командный гандбол; Теннис; Легкая атлетика; Алтимат фрисби; Универсальный; Волейбол; Водное поло; Борьба; Йога; Другое
it: Attività: Aerobica; Aikido; Air hockey; Calcio australiano; Badminton; Danza classica; Baseball; Basket; Boxe; Jiu Jitsu brasiliano; Gara di macchine; Cheerleading; Arrampicata; Cricket; Ciclismo; Danza; Freccette; Hockey su prato; Pesca; Pallavolo; Football; Calcio a 5; Calcio gaelico; Golf; Ginnastica; Palla a mano; Escursionismo; Hockey; Equitazione; Da caccia; Lancio; Hockey su ghiaccio; Pattinaggio in linea; Judo; Karatè; Kickboxing; Krav Maga; Lacrosse; Arti marziali miste (MMA); Motociclismo; Muay Thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Rounder; Rugby; Corsa; Skateboarding; Sci; Snowboard; Calcio; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Pallamano a squadre; Tennis; Atletica leggera; Frisbee; Universale; Volleyball; Pallanuoto; Wrestling; Yoga; Altro
el: Δραστηριότητα: Αεροβική; Αϊκίντο; Επιτραπέζιο χόκεϊ; Αυστραλιανό ποδόσφαιρο; Μπάντμιντον; Μπαλέτο; Μπέιζμπολ; Μπάσκετ; Πυγμαχία; Βραζιλιάνικο ζίου ζίτσου; Αγώνες αυτοκινήτων; Τσιρλίντινγκ; Ορειβασία; Κρίκετ; Ποδηλασία; Χορός; Βελάκια; Χόκεϊ επί χόρτου; Ψάρεμα; Χόκεϊ σάλας; Αμερικανικό ποδόσφαιρο; Ποδόσφαιρο σάλας; Ιρλανδικό ποδόσφαιρο; Γκολφ; Ενόργανη γυμναστική; Χάντμπολ; Πεζοπορία; Χόκεϊ; Ιππασία; Κυνήγι; Ιρλανδικό χόκεϊ; Χόκεϊ επί πάγου; Πατίνια με μονή σειρά τροχών; Τζούντο; Καράτε; Κικ μπόξινγκ; Κραβ μαγκά; Λακρός; Μικτές πολεμικές τέχνες (MMA); Οδήγηση μοτοσικλέτας; Μουάι τάι; Νέτμπολ; Πάντελ; Πιλάτες; Ράκετμπολ; Rounders; Ράγκμπι; Τρέξιμο; Σκέιτμπορντ; Σκι; Χιονοσανίδα; Ποδόσφαιρο; Σόφτμπολ; Σκουός; Ταεκβοντό; Ομαδικό χάντμπολ; Τένις; Στίβος; Ultimate frisbee; Universal; Βόλεϊ; Υδατοσφαίριση; Πάλη; Γιόγκα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Aktivnost: Aerobika; Aikido; Zračni hokej; Avstralski nogomet; Badminton; Balet; Bejzbol; Košarka; Boks; Brazilski jiu-jitsu; Avtomobilske dirke; Navijanje; Plezanje; Kriket; Kolesarjenje; Ples; Pikado; Hokej na travi; Ribolov; Parketni hokej; Ameriški nogomet; Futsal; Irski nogomet; Golf; Gimnastika; Rokomet; Pohodništvo; Hokej; Jahanje; Lov; Hurling; Hokej na ledu; Rolanje; Judo; Karate; Kickboxing; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Mešane borilne veščine (MMA); Motociklizem; Muay thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Rounders; Ragbi; Tek; Rolkanje; Smučanje; Deskanje na snegu; Nogomet; Softball; Skvoš; Taekwondo; Ekipni rokomet; Tenis; Atletika; Ultimativni frizbi; Univerzalno; Odbojka; Vaterpolo; Rokoborba; Joga; Druga
ro-RO: Activitate: Aerobic; Aikido; Air hockey; Fotbal australian; Badminton; Balet; Baseball; Baschetbal; Box; Jiu-jitsu brazilian; Curse de mașini; Majorete; Cățărat; Cricket; Ciclism; Dans; Darts; Hochei pe iarbă; Pescuit; Hochei în sală; Fotbal; Futsal; Fotbal galic; Golf; Gimnastică; Handbal; Drumeții; Hochei; Echitație; Vânătoare; Hurling; Hochei pe gheață; Patinaj în linie; Judo; Karate; Kickboxing; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Arte marțiale mixte (MMA); Motociclism; Muay thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Rounders; Rugby; Alergat; Skateboarding; Schi; Snowboarding; Soccer; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Handbal în echipă; Tenis; Atletism; Ultimate frisbee; Universal; Volei; Polo pe apă; Lupte; Yoga; Altele
nb: Aktivitet: Aerobic; Aikido; Lufthockey; Australsk fotball; Badminton; Ballett; Baseball; Basketball; Boksing; Brasiliansk jiu-jitsu; Skiløp; Cheerleading; Klatring; Cricket; Sykling; Dansing; Dart; Landhockey; Fisking; Innebandy; Amerikansk fotball; Futsal; Gaelisk fotball; Golf; Gymnastikk; Håndball; Fjelltur; Hockey; Hesteridning; Jakt; Hurling; Ishockey; Rulleskøyter; Judo; Karate; Kickboksing; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Mixed martial arts (MMA); Motorsykkelkjøring; Thaiboksing; Nettball; Padel; Pilates; Racketball; Slåball; Rugby; Løping; Skateboarding; Stå på ski; Snowboard; Fotball; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Håndball; Tennis; Friidrett; Ultimate frisbee; Universal; Volleyball; Vannpolo; Bryting; Yoga; Annen
en: Activity: Aerobics; Aikido; Air hockey; Australian football; Badminton; Ballet; Baseball; Basketball; Boxing; Brazilian jiu-jitsu; Car racing; Cheerleading; Climbing; Cricket; Cycling; Dancing; Darts; Field hockey; Fishing; Floorball; Football; Futsal; Gaelic football; Golf; Gymnastics; Handball; Hiking; Hockey; Horse riding; Hunting; Hurling; Ice hockey; Inline skating; Judo; Karate; Kickboxing; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Mixed martial arts (MMA); Motorcycling; Muay thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Rounders; Rugby; Running; Skateboarding; Skiing; Snowboarding; Soccer; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Team handball; Tennis; Track & field; Ultimate frisbee; Universal; Volleyball; Water polo; Wrestling; Yoga; Other
tr: Aktivite: Aerobik; Aikido; Hava hokeyi; Avustralya futbolu; Badminton; Bale; Beyzbol; Basketbol; Boks; Brezilya jiu-jitsusu; Araba yarışı; Amigoluk; Tırmanış; Kriket; Bisiklet; Dans; Dartlar; Çim hokeyi; Balıkçılık; Florbol; Futbol; Futsal; Gal futbolu; Golf; Jimnastik; Hentbol; Doğa yürüyüşü; Hokey; Binicilik; Avcılık; Fırlatma; Buz hokeyi; Inline paten; Judo; Karate; Kikboks; Krav maga; Lakros; Karma dövüş sanatları (MMA); Motosiklet; Muay thai; Netbol; Padel; Pilates; Raketbol; Rounders; Ragbi; Koşu; Kaykay Tahtası; Kayak; Snowboard; Futbol; Softbol; Squash; Tekvando; Takım Hentbolu; Tenis; Atletizm; Ultimate frizbi; Her türden mekana uygun; Voleybol; Su polosu; Güreş; Yoga; Diğer
hr-HR: Aktivnost: Aerobik; Aikido; Stolni hokej; Australski nogomet; Badminton; Balet; Bejzbol; Košarka; Boks; Brazilski jiu-jitsu; Automobilske utrke; Navijanje; Penjanje; Kriket; Biciklizam; Ples; Pikado; Hokej na travi; Ribolov; Floorball; Američki nogomet; Futsal; Gaelski nogomet; Golf; Gimnastika; Rukomet; Planinarenje; Hokej; Jahanje; Lov; Hurling; Hokej na ledu; Rolanje; Judo; Karate; Kickboxing; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Mješovite borilačke vještine (MMA); Motociklizam; Muay thai; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Rounders; Ragbi; Trčanje; Skejtanje; Skijanje; Snowboarding; Nogomet; Softbol; Skvoš; Taekwondo; Timski rukomet; Tenis; Atletika; Ultimate frizbi; Univerzalno; Odbojka; Vaterpolo; Hrvanje; Joga; Ostalo
fi: Aktiivisuus: Aerobic; Aikido; Ilmakiekko; Australialainen jalkapallo; Sulkapallo; Baletti; Pesäpallo; Koripallo; Nyrkkeily; Brasilialainen jiu-jitsu; Kilpa-autoilu; Cheerleading; Kiipeily; Kriketti; Pyöräily; Tanssi; Darts; Maahockey; Kalastus; Salibandy; Jalkapallo; Futsal; Gaelilainen jalkapallo; Golf; Voimistelu; Käsipallo; Patikointi; Jääkiekko; Hevosratsastus; Metsästys; Hurling; Jääkiekko; Rullaluistelu; Judo; Karate; Potkunyrkkeily; Krav maga; Lacrosse; Vapaaottelu (MMA); Moottoripyöräily; Thainyrkkeily; Verkkopallo; Padel; Pilates; Racquetball; Rounders; Rugby; Lenkkeily; Rullalautailu; Hiihto; Lumilautailu; Jalkapallo; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Tiimikäsipallo; Tennis; Yleisurheilu; Ultimate frisbee; Yleinen; Lentopallo; Vesipallo; Paini; Jooga; Muu
ko: 활동: 에어로빅; 합기도; 에어 하키; 호주식 축구; 배드민턴; 발레; 야구; 농구; 권투; 브라질리언 주짓수; 카 레이싱; 치어리딩; 등반; 크리켓; 사이클링; 무용; 다트; 필드하키; 낚시; 플로어볼; 풋볼; 풋살; 게일식 축구; 골프; 체조; 핸드볼; 하이킹; 하키; 승마; 사냥; 헐링; 아이스 하키; 인라인 스케이트; 유도; 가라테; 킥복싱; 크라브 마가; 라크로스; 종합격투기(MMA); 모터사이클; 무에타이; 넷볼; 빠델; 필라테스; 라켓볼; 라운더스; 럭비; 달리기; 스케이트보딩; 스키; 스노보드; 축구; 소프트볼; 스쿼시; 태권도; 팀 핸드볼; 테니스; 육상 경기; 얼티밋 프리스비; 범용; 배구; 수구; 레슬링; 요가; 기타
cs: Činnost: Aerobik; Aikido; Stolní hokej; Australský fotbal; Badminton; Balet; Baseball; Basketbal; Box; Brazilské jiu-jitsu; Automobilové závody; Roztleskávání; Lezectví; Kriket; Cyklistika; Tanec; Jednotlivé šipky a sady šipek; Pozemní hokej; Rybaření; Florbal; Fotbal; Futsal; Galský fotbal; Golf; Gymnastika; Házená; Turistika; Hokej; Jezdectví; Lov; Hurling; Lední hokej; Inline bruslení; Judo; Karate; Kickboxing; Krav maga; Lakros; Smíšená bojová umění (MMA); Motocyklismus; Thajský box; Netball; Padel; Pilates; Raketbal; Pálkovaná; Ragby; Běhání; Skateboardové vybavení; Lyžování; Snowboarding; Kopaná; Softball; Squash; Taekwondo; Týmová házená; Tenis; Atletika; Ultimate frisbee; Univerzální; Volejbal; Vodní pólo; Zápas; Jóga; Jiné